Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-6201
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-6201 to 71-6229 shall be known and may be cited
as the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 384, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 102;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 3.